Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1822
Inspection; grade; appeal; procedure.

Any person having a direct financial interest, who is dissatisfied with the grade established by inspection under the Nebraska Potato Inspection Act, may appeal to the director in writing for reinspection. Such appeal shall be made within ten days after inspection and before shipment of the inspected potatoes. Upon receipt of such appeal, the director shall cause a reinspection to be completed to determine the grade in dispute, and upon completion of the reinspection, he or she shall make known his or her findings to all persons having a direct financial interest. All parties shall be bound by the findings following the reinspection. In the event that the reinspection does not determine a new or different grade, all costs of the reinspection shall be paid to the director by the person requesting reinspection. Any official inspection certificate issued as the result of a reinspection shall supersede the original official certificate. The findings may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 14, p. 190;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 3.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.